Utah statutes.
46-1-4.   Bond.

(1)  A notarial commission may not become effective until a constitutional oath of office and a $5,000 bond has been filed with and approved by the lieutenant governor.  The bond shall be executed by a licensed surety for a term of four years commencing on the commission's effective date and terminating on its expiration date, with payment of bond funds to any person conditioned upon the notary's misconduct while acting in the scope of his commission.

(2)  The bond required under Subsection (1) may be executed by the Office of Risk Management for notaries public employed by a state office or agency.



Amended by Chapter 136, 2003 General Session

